Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB838.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1338(c)(1) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1338. Person with disability plate and placard.* * *(c) Health care provider's statement.--(1) Any person applying for a special plate or parking placard for persons with disabilities must present a statement, certified by a physician, podiatrist, chiropractor, optometrist, physician assistant, physical therapist, occupational therapist or certified registered nurse practitioner licensed or certified to practice in this Commonwealth or in a contiguous state, that the person with a 123456789101112131415161718 disability is disabled as provided in subsection (a).* * *(c.3) Temporary placard program for health care facilities.--(1) Upon review and approval of an application for enrollment by a qualified health care facility, the department shall permit the health care facility to issue temporary disability parking placards directly to individuals. The department shall supply the health care facility with training and materials related to issuing, storing, ordering and returning placards. The following shall apply:(i) The department shall determine the types of health care facilities that may qualify for enrollment. A qualified health care facility shall include a hospital, medical specialist center and physical therapy center.(ii) Upon denial of an application for enrollment, a health care facility may appeal the departmental determination by requesting, within 10 days of the date of the determination, a formal hearing as prescribed by departmental regulations.(2) A temporary disability parking placard may be issued upon application by an individual to the health care facility. The department shall prescribe the form of the application. The application must include a statement signed by the individual asserting that the individual meets the qualifications of subsection (a).(3) A health care provider shall electronically submit a copy of the completed application with a health care provider's statement that the individual is disabled in 20250HB0838PN0868 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accordance with subsection (c) to the department to enable the department to update its records to reflect the issuance of the temporary disability parking placard.(4) A temporary disability parking placard issued by a health care provider is valid for a period of not more than six months.(5) The department shall promulgate rules and regulations to implement this subsection.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 30 days.20250HB0838PN0868 - 3 - 12345678910